Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-902
Offer of judgment; no cause for continuance or postponement.

The making of an offer pursuant to the provisions contained in section 25-901 shall not be a cause for a continuance of an action, or a postponement of a trial.

R.S.1867, Code § 566, p. 493;

R.S.1913, § 7718;

C.S.1922, § 8662;

C.S.1929, § 20-902;

R.S.1943, § 25-902.